Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
ELECTRONIC WASTE RECYCLING

Note

Sections 339D-2 through 339D-6 designated as part II by L
2009, c 183, §4.

§339D-2 Scope of products. The
collection, transportation, and recycling provisions of this part shall apply
only to covered electronic devices used and discarded in this State by a
covered entity. [L Sp 2008, c 13, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 183, §9]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next